apertium-ara-heb.heb.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>אבגדהוזחטיכךלמםנןסעפףצץקרשת•ﭏ'</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"           c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="pr"          c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="ij"          c="Interjection"/>
    <sdef n="abbr"        c="Abbreviation"/>
    <sdef n="rel"         c="Relative"/>
    <sdef n="prn"         c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="det"         c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="np"          c="Proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="p1"          c="First person"/>
    <sdef n="p2"          c="Second person"/>
    <sdef n="p3"          c="Third person"/>
    
    <sdef n="an"          c="Animate / inanimate"/>

    <sdef n="m"           c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="f"           c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="mf"          c="Masculine / feminine"/>
 
    <sdef n="top"         c="Toponym"/>
    <sdef n="ant"         c="Anthroponym"/>
    <sdef n="cog"         c="Cognomen"/>
    <sdef n="al"          c="Altres"/>

    <sdef n="ord"         c="Ordinal"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"         c="Quantative"/>
    
    <sdef n="sg"          c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="du"          c="Dual"/>
    <sdef n="pl"          c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="sp"          c="Singular / plural"/>
    
    <sdef n="vblex"       c="Verb, lexical"/>
	<sdef n="vaux"		  c="Auxillary verb"/>
    <sdef n="past"        c="Past tense"/>
    <sdef n="inf"         c="Infinitive"/>
    <sdef n="fut"         c="Future"/>
    <sdef n="pres"        c="Present"/>
    <sdef n="imp"         c="Imperative"/>

    <sdef n="cons"        c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="px1sg"       c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="px1pl"       c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="px2sg_m"     c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="px2sg_f"     c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="px2pl_m"     c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="px2pl_f"     c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="px3sg_m"     c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="px3sg_f"     c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="px3pl_m"     c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="px3pl_f"     c="Noun"/>
    
    <sdef n="subj"        c="Subject"/>
    <sdef n="obj"         c="Object"/>
    <sdef n="def"         c="Definite"/>
    <sdef n="dem"         c="Demonstrative"/>
    <sdef n="ind"         c="Indefinite"/>
    <sdef n="pos"         c="Possesive"/>
    <sdef n="itg"         c="Interrogative"/>
    <sdef n="num"         c="Numeral"/>
    <sdef n="adv"         c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="adj"         c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"      c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"      c="Sub-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"      c="Adverbial conjunction"/>

    <sdef n="cm"          c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="sent"        c="Sentence marker"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>

    <!-- SECTION: Punctuation -->

    <pardef n="separa">
      <e><re>[.\?;:!]</re><p>          <l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="coma">
      <e><p>          <l>,</l><r>,<s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="urls">
    <e>
      <re>(http://|https://|ftp://)?[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9](([\-_])?[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9])*(.[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9](([\-_])?[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9])*)*(.[a-z][a-z]|.aero|.asia|.biz|.cat|.com|.coop|.edu|.gov|.info|.int|.jobs|.mil|.mobi|.museum|.name|.net|.org|.pro|.tel|.travel)(/([áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+(.[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+)*/)*([áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+(.[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+)*)?)?</re><p><l></l> <r><s n="num"/></r> </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e><re>(Lm|€|£) ?.?[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)? ?%</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><i>-</i><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?%?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?[:.][0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?[:.][0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)? ?(a|p|A|P).?(m|M).?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Abbreviations -->
    <pardef n="abbr">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Interjections -->
    <pardef n="אמן__ij">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="ij"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Conjunctions -->
    <pardef n="ו__cnjcoo">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="כאשר__cnjsub">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="cnjsub"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="לכן__cnjadv">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="cnjadv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<!-- SECTION: Auxillary Verbs -->
	<pardef n="האם__vaux">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
	<pardef n="יש__vaux">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="vaux"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
    <!-- SECTION: Prepositions -->

    <pardef n="ללא__pr">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ב__pr">  <!-- הם/הן 3 pl type -->
      <e><p>          <l>י</l><r><j/>ו<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ך</l><r><j/>ו<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ך</l><r><j/>ו<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ו</l><r><j/>ו<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ה</l><r><j/>ו<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נו</l><r><j/>ו<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כם</l><r><j/>ו<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כן</l><r><j/>ו<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>הם</l><r><j/>ו<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>הן</l><r><j/>ו<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="בשביל__pr">  <!-- ם/ן 3 pl type -->
      <e><p>          <l>י</l><r><j/>ו<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ך</l><r><j/>ו<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ך</l><r><j/>ו<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ו</l><r><j/>ו<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ה</l><r><j/>ו<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נו</l><r><j/>ו<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כם</l><r><j/>ו<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כן</l><r><j/>ו<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ם</l><r><j/>ו<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ן</l><r><j/>ו<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<e lm="האם"><i>האם</i><par n="האם__vaux"/></e>
	<e lm="יש"><i>יש</i><par n="יש__vaux"/></e>
	<e lm="חייב"><i>חייב</i><par n="יש__vaux"/></e>
    <e lm="יתר על כן"><i>יתר על כן</i><par n="ו__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="בנוסף"><i>בנוסף</i><par n="ו__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="אבל"><i>אבל</i><par n="ו__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ברם"><i>ברם</i><par n="ו__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="לשם כך"><i>לשם כך</i><par n="ו__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="פן"><i>פן</i><par n="ו__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="לעומת זאת"><i>לעומת זאת</i><par n="ו__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="לו"><i>לו</i><par n="ו__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="אלמלא"><i>אלמלא</i><par n="ו__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="גם אם"><i>גם אם</i><par n="ו__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="לתכלית זאת"><i>לתכלית זאת</i><par n="ו__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="שמא"><i>שמא</i><par n="ו__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="כאשר"><i>כאשר</i><par n="כאשר__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="קודם לכן"><i>קודם לכן</i><par n="כאשר__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="בטרם"><i>בטרם</i><par n="כאשר__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="מאז"><i>מאז</i><par n="כאשר__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="לאחר מכן"><i>לאחר מכן</i><par n="כאשר__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="לעומת זאת"><i>לעומת זאת</i><par n="כאשר__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="בניגוד לכך"><i>בניגוד לכך</i><par n="כאשר__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="שכן"><i>שכן</i><par n="כאשר__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="בעקבות"><i>בעקבות</i><par n="כאשר__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="עקב"><i>עקב</i><par n="כאשר__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="הואיל וכך"><i>הואיל וכך</i><par n="כאשר__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="בעקבות זאת"><i>בעקבות זאת</i><par n="כאשר__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="מכיוון שכך"><i>מכיוון שכך</i><par n="כאשר__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e><p><l>בלעד</l><r>בלי</r></p><par n="ללא__pr"/><par n="על__pr"/></e>
    <e><p><l>לתוכ</l><r>לתוך</r></p><par n="ללא__pr"/><par n="בשביל__pr"/></e>
    <e><i>תחת</i><par n="ללא__pr"/><par n="על__pr"/></e>
    <e><i>מתחת</i><par n="ללא__pr"/><par n="על__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="אחרי"><i>אחרי</i><par n="ללא__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="אצל"><i>אצל</i><par n="ללא__pr"/></e>
    <e><i>אצל</i><par n="ללא__pr"/><par n="בשביל__pr"/></e>
    <e><i>בגלל</i><par n="ללא__pr"/><par n="בשביל__pr"/></e>
    <e><p><l>במקומ</l><r>במקום</r></p><par n="בשביל__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="בעצם"><i>בעצם</i><par n="ללא__pr"/></e>
    <e><p><l>בעצמ</l><r>בעצם</r></p><par n="ללא__pr"/><par n="בשביל__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="בשביל"><i>בשביל</i><par n="ללא__pr"/><par n="בשביל__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="בשל"><i>בשל</i><par n="ללא__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="חוץ מ"><i>חוץ<b/>מ</i><par n="ללא__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="כמו"><i>כמו</i><par n="ללא__pr"/></e>
    <e><i>ל</i><par n="ללא__pr"/><par n="ב__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="לאחר"><i>לאחר</i><par n="ללא__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ליד"><i>ליד</i><par n="ללא__pr"/><par n="בשביל__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="לכבוד"><i>לכבוד</i><par n="ללא__pr"/></e>
    <e><p><l>למענ</l><r>למען</r></p><par n="ללא__pr"/><par n="בשביל__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="למרות"><i>למרות</i><par n="ללא__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="מ"><i>מ</i><par n="ללא__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="מול עיני"><i>מול<b/>עיני</i><par n="ללא__pr"/></e>
    <e><i>מלבד</i><par n="ללא__pr"/><par n="בשביל__pr"/></e>
    <e><p><l/><r>מן</r></p><par n="ללא__pr"/><par n="מן__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="על"><i>על</i><par n="ללא__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="של"><i>של</i><par n="ללא__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="של"><i>של</i><par n="ללא__pr"/><par n="ב__pr"/></e>
    <e><i>ב</i><par n="ללא__pr"/><par n="ב__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="עם"><i>עם</i><par n="ללא__pr"/></e>
    <e><p><l>את</l><r>עם</r></p><par n="ללא__pr"/><par n="בשביל__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="תוך"><i>תוך</i><par n="ו__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="כדי ש"><i>כדי ש</i><par n="ו__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="למען ה"><i>למען ה</i><par n="ו__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="על מנת ל"><i>על מנת ל</i><par n="ו__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="במקביל ל"><i>במקביל ל</i><par n="ו__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="כשם ש"><i>כשם ש</i><par n="ו__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="פחות מ"><i>פחות מ</i><par n="ו__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="אף על פי ש"><i>אף על פי ש</i><par n="ו__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="לרבות ה"><i>לרבות ה</i><par n="ו__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="בשביל"><i>בשביל</i><par n="כאשר__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="כש"><i>כש</i><par n="כאשר__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="אחרי ש"><i>אחרי ש</i><par n="כאשר__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="לעומת ה"><i>לעומת ה</i><par n="כאשר__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="הואיל ו"><i>הואיל ו</i><par n="כאשר__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="בגין ה"><i>בגין ה</i><par n="כאשר__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="כך ש"><i>כך ש</i><par n="כאשר__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="בזמן ש"><i>בזמן<b/>ש</i><par n="לכן__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="לכן"><i>לכן</i><par n="לכן__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="כל כך"><i>כל<b/>כך</i><par n="לכן__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="בעוד ש"><i>בעוד<b/>ש</i><par n="לכן__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="אמן"><i>אמן</i><par n="אמן__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="כן"><i>כן</i><par n="אמן__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="לא"><i>לא</i><par n="אמן__ij"/></e>
    <e lm=""><i>ד"ר</i><par n="abbr"/></e>
    <e lm=""><i>לפנה"צ</i><par n="abbr"/></e>
    <e lm=""><i>אחה"צ</i><par n="abbr"/></e>
    <e><par n="separa"/></e>
    <e><par n="coma"/></e>
    <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
    <e><par n="urls"/></e>
